California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(7) Hours of experience shall not have been gained more than six years prior to the date the application for licensure was received by the board, except that up to 500 hours of clinical experience gained in the supervised practicum required by subdivision (c) of Section 4980.37 and subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 4980.36 shall be exempt from this six-year requirement.

(8) A minimum of 1,750 hours of direct clinical counseling with individuals, groups, couples, or families, that includes not less than 500 total hours of experience in diagnosing and treating
 couples,
 families, and children.

(9) A maximum of 1,200 hours gained under the supervision of a licensed educational psychologist providing educationally related mental health services that are consistent with the scope of practice of an educational psychologist, as specified in Section 4989.14.

(10) A maximum of 1,250 hours of nonclinical practice, consisting of direct supervisor contact, administering and evaluating psychological tests, writing clinical reports, writing progress or process notes, client-centered advocacy, and workshops, seminars, training sessions, or conferences directly related to marriage and family therapy that have been approved by the applicant’s supervisor.

(11) It is anticipated and
 encouraged that hours of experience will include working with elders and dependent adults who have physical or mental limitations that restrict their ability to carry out normal activities or protect their rights.

This subdivision shall only apply to hours gained on and after January 1, 2010.

(d) An individual who submits an application for licensure between January 1, 2016, and December 31, 2020, may alternatively qualify under the experience requirements of this section that were in place on January 1, 2015.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 747, Sec. 4.   (AB 690)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4980.43.1.

(a) All trainees, associates, and applicants for licensure shall be under the supervision of a supervisor at all times.

(b) As used in this chapter, the term “supervision” means responsibility for, and control of, the quality of mental health and related services provided by the supervisee. Consultation or peer discussion shall not be considered supervision and shall not qualify as supervised experience. Supervision includes, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Ensuring the extent, kind, and quality of counseling performed is consistent with the education, training, and experience of the supervisee.

(2) Monitoring and evaluating the supervisee’s assessment, diagnosis, and treatment decisions and providing regular feedback.

(3) Monitoring and evaluating the supervisee’s ability to provide services at the site or sites where he or she is practicing and to the particular clientele being served.

(4) Monitoring and addressing clinical dynamics, including, but not limited to, countertransference-, intrapsychic-, interpersonal-, or trauma-related issues that may affect the supervisory or practitioner-patient relationship.

(5) Ensuring the supervisee’s compliance with laws and regulations governing the practice of marriage and family therapy.

(6) Reviewing the supervisee’s progress notes, process notes, and other patient treatment records, as
 deemed appropriate by the supervisor.

(7) With the client’s written consent, providing direct observation or review of audio or video recordings of the supervisee’s counseling or therapy, as deemed appropriate by the supervisor.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 743, Sec. 11.   (AB 93)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

4980.43.2.

(a) Except for experience gained by attending workshops, seminars, training sessions, or conferences, as described in paragraph (10) of subdivision (c) of Section 4980.43, direct supervisor contact shall occur as follows:

(1) Supervision shall include at least one hour of direct supervisor contact in each week for which experience is credited in each work setting.

(2) A trainee shall receive an average of at least one hour of direct supervisor contact for every five hours of direct clinical counseling performed each week in each setting. For experience gained on or after January 1, 2009, no more than six hours of supervision,
 whether individual, triadic, or group, shall be credited during any single week.

(3) An associate gaining experience who performs more than 10 hours of direct clinical counseling in a week in any setting shall receive at least one additional hour of direct supervisor contact for that setting. For experience gained on or after January 1, 2009, no more than six hours of supervision, whether individual, triadic, or group, shall be credited during any single week.

(4) Of the 104 weeks of required supervision, 52 weeks shall be individual supervision, triadic supervision, or a combination of both.

(b) (1) For purposes of this chapter, “one hour of direct supervisor contact” means any of the following:

(A) Individual supervision, which means one hour of face-to-face contact between one supervisor and one person receiving supervision for providing clinical mental health services.

(B) Triadic supervision, which means one hour of face-to-face contact between one supervisor and two persons receiving supervision for providing clinical mental health services.

(C) Group supervision, which means two hours of face-to-face contact between one supervisor and no more than eight persons receiving supervision for providing clinical mental health services. Segments of group supervision may be split into no less than one continuous hour. A supervisor shall ensure that the amount and degree of supervision is appropriate for each person in
 the group.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, “face-to-face contact” means in-person contact, contact via two-way, real-time videoconferencing, or some combination of these.

(c) The supervisor shall be responsible for ensuring compliance with federal and state laws relating to confidentiality of patient health information.

(d) (1) Within 60 days of the commencement of supervision, a supervisor shall conduct a meeting with the supervisee during which the supervisor shall assess the appropriateness of allowing the supervisee to receive supervision via two-way, real-time videoconferencing. This assessment of appropriateness shall include, but is not limited to, the abilities of the supervisee, the preferences
 of both the supervisee and supervisor, and the privacy of the locations of the supervisee and supervisor while supervision is conducted.

(2) The supervisor shall document the results of the assessment made pursuant to paragraph (1), and shall not utilize supervision
 via two-way, real-time videoconferencing if their assessment finds it is not appropriate.

(e) Direct supervisor contact shall occur within the same week as the hours claimed.

(f) Alternative supervision may be arranged during a supervisor’s vacation or sick leave if the alternative supervision meets the requirements of this chapter.

(g) Notwithstanding any other law, once the required number of experience hours are gained, associates and applicants for licensure shall receive a minimum of one hour of direct supervisor contact per week for each practice setting in which direct clinical counseling is performed. Once the required number of experience hours are gained, further supervision for nonclinical practice, as
 defined in paragraph (10) of subdivision (c) of Section 4980.43, shall be at the supervisor’s discretion.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 160, Sec. 3) by Stats. 2025, Ch. 787, Sec. 58.   (SB 775)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4980.43.3.

(a) A trainee, associate, or applicant for licensure shall only perform mental health and related services as an employee or volunteer, and not as an independent contractor. The requirements of this chapter regarding hours of experience and supervision shall apply equally to employees and volunteers. A trainee, associate, or applicant for licensure shall not perform any services or gain any experience within the scope of practice of the profession, as defined in Section 4980.02, as an independent contractor. While an associate may be either a paid employee or a volunteer, employers are encouraged to provide fair remuneration.

(1) If employed, an associate shall provide the board, upon application
 for licensure, with copies of the W-2 tax forms for each year of experience claimed. For experience gained during a tax year that has not ended by the date the associate’s application for licensure is received by the board, the associate shall provide the board with a copy of their most recent pay stub.

(2) If volunteering, an associate shall provide the board, upon application for licensure, with a letter from the associate’s employer verifying the associate’s status as a volunteer during the dates the experience was gained.

(b) (1) A trainee shall not perform services in a private practice or a professional corporation. A trainee may be credited with supervised experience completed in a setting that meets all of the following:

(A) Is not a private practice or professional corporation.

(B) Lawfully and regularly provides mental health counseling or psychotherapy.

(C) Provides oversight to ensure that the trainee’s work at the setting meets the experience and supervision requirements in this chapter and is within the scope of practice for the profession, as defined in Section 4980.02.

(2) Only experience gained in the position for which the trainee volunteers or is employed shall qualify as supervised experience.

(c) (1) An associate may be credited with supervised experience completed in any setting that meets
 both of the following:

(A) Lawfully and regularly provides mental health counseling or psychotherapy.

(B) Provides oversight to ensure that the associate’s work at the setting meets the experience and supervision requirements in this chapter and is within the scope of practice for the profession, as defined in Section 4980.02.

(2) Only experience gained in the position for which the associate volunteers or is employed shall qualify as supervised experience.

(3) An applicant for registration as an associate shall not be employed or volunteer in a private practice or professional corporation until the applicant has been issued an associate registration
 by the board.

(d) Any experience obtained under the supervision of a spouse, relative, or domestic partner shall not be credited toward the required hours of supervised experience. Any experience obtained under the supervision of a supervisor with whom the applicant has had or currently has a personal, professional, or business relationship that undermines the authority or effectiveness of the supervision shall not be credited toward the required hours of supervised experience.

(e) A trainee, associate, or applicant for licensure shall not receive any remuneration from patients or clients and shall only be paid by their employer, if an employee.

(f) A trainee, associate, or applicant for licensure shall have no proprietary
 interest in their employer’s business and shall not lease or rent space, pay for furnishings, equipment, or supplies, or in any other way pay for the obligations of their employer.

(g) A trainee, associate, or applicant for licensure who provides voluntary services in any lawful work setting and who only receives reimbursement for expenses actually incurred shall be considered an employee. The board may audit an applicant for licensure who receives reimbursement for expenses and the applicant for licensure shall have the burden of demonstrating that the payment received was for reimbursement of expenses actually incurred.

(h) A trainee, associate, or applicant for licensure who receives a stipend or educational loan repayment from a program designed to encourage demographically
 underrepresented groups to enter the profession or to improve recruitment and retention in underserved regions or settings shall be considered an employee. The board may audit an applicant who receives a stipend or educational loan repayment and the applicant shall have the burden of demonstrating that the payment received was for the specified purposes.

(i) An associate or a trainee may provide services via telehealth that are in the scope of practice outlined in this chapter.

(j) Each educational institution preparing applicants pursuant to this chapter shall consider requiring, and shall encourage, its students to undergo individual, marital, conjoint, family, or group counseling or psychotherapy, as appropriate. Each supervisor shall consider, advise, and encourage the
 supervisor’s associates and trainees regarding the advisability of undertaking individual, marital, conjoint, family, or group counseling or psychotherapy, as appropriate. Insofar as it is deemed appropriate and is desired by the applicant, educational institutions and supervisors are encouraged to assist the applicant to locate counseling or psychotherapy at a reasonable cost.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 787, Sec. 60.   (SB 775)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4980.43.4.

(a) A trainee, associate, or applicant for licensure shall only perform mental health and related services at the places where their employer permits business to be conducted.

(b) An associate who is employed by or is volunteering in a private practice or a professional corporation shall be supervised by an individual who is both of the following:

(1) Is employed by or contracted by the associate’s employer or is an owner of the private practice or professional corporation.

(2) Either provides psychotherapeutic services to clients for the associate’s employer, or
 meets both of the following:

(A) The supervisor and the associate’s employer have a written contract providing the supervisor the same access to the associate’s clinical records provided to employees of that employer.

(B) The associate’s clients authorize the release of their clinical records to the supervisor.

(c) At any one time, supervisors in nonexempt settings shall not serve as individual or triadic supervisors for more than a total of six persons who are not fully licensed at the highest level for independent clinical practice and who are receiving supervision for providing clinical mental health services in a nonexempt setting.

(d) A written oversight agreement, as specified by the board by regulation, shall be executed between the supervisor and employer when the supervisor is not employed by the supervisee’s employer or is a volunteer. The supervisor shall evaluate the site or sites where the supervisee will be gaining experience to determine that the site or sites comply with the requirements of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 160, Sec. 5.   (SB 1024)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

4980.43.5.

The board may audit the records of any supervisor to verify the completion of the supervisor qualifications specified by this chapter and by regulation. A supervisor shall maintain records of completion of the required supervisor qualifications for seven years after termination of the supervision and shall make these records available to the board for auditing purposes upon request.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 743, Sec. 14.   (AB 93)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

4980.44.

An associate marriage and family therapist employed under this chapter shall comply with the following requirements:

(a) Inform each client or patient prior to performing any mental health and related services that the person is an unlicensed registered associate marriage and family therapist, provide the person’s registration number and the name of the person’s employer, and indicate whether the person is under the supervision of a licensed marriage and family therapist, licensed clinical social worker, licensed professional clinical counselor, psychologist licensed pursuant to Chapter 6.6 (commencing with Section 2900), licensed educational psychologist, or a licensed physician and surgeon certified in
 psychiatry by the American Board of Psychiatry and Neurology.

(b) (1) Any advertisement by or on behalf of a registered associate marriage and family therapist shall include, at a minimum, all of the following information:

(A) That the person is a registered associate marriage and family therapist.

(B) The associate’s registration number.

(C) The name of the person’s employer.

(D) That the person is supervised by a licensed person.

(2) The abbreviation “AMFT” shall not be used in an advertisement unless the title
 “registered associate marriage and family therapist” appears in the advertisement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 321, Sec. 3.   (AB 1651)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

4980.46.

Any licensed marriage and family therapist who owns a business using a fictitious business name shall not use any name that is false, misleading, or deceptive, and shall inform the patient, prior to the commencement of treatment, of the name and license designation of the owner or owners of the practice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 747, Sec. 8.   (AB 690)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4980.48.

(a) A trainee shall, prior to performing any professional services, inform each client or patient that the trainee is an unlicensed marriage and family therapist trainee, provide the name of the trainee’s employer, and indicate whether the trainee is under the supervision of a licensed marriage and family therapist, a licensed clinical social worker, a licensed professional clinical counselor, a licensed psychologist, a licensed physician certified in psychiatry by the American Board of Psychiatry and Neurology, or a licensed educational psychologist.

(b) Any person that advertises services performed by a trainee shall include the trainee’s name, the supervisor’s license designation
 or abbreviation, and the supervisor’s license number.

(c) Any advertisement by or on behalf of a marriage and family therapist trainee shall include, at a minimum, all of the following information:

(1) That the trainee is a marriage and family therapist trainee.

(2) The name of the trainee’s employer.

(3) That the trainee is supervised by a licensed person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 321, Sec. 4.   (AB 1651)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

4980.49.

(a) A marriage and family therapist shall retain a client’s or patient’s health service records for a minimum of seven years from the date therapy is terminated. If the client or patient is a minor, the client’s or patient’s health service records shall be retained for a minimum of seven years from the date the client or the patient reaches 18 years of age. Health service records may be retained in either a written or an electronic format.

(b) This section shall apply only to the records of a client or patient whose therapy is terminated on or after January 1, 2015.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 312, Sec. 1.   (SB 578)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

4980.50.

(a) Every applicant who meets the educational and experience requirements and applies for a license as a marriage and family therapist shall be examined by the board. The examinations shall be as set forth in Section 4980.397. The examinations shall be given at least twice a year at a time and place and under supervision as the board may determine. The board shall examine the candidate with regard to the candidate’s knowledge and professional skills and judgment in the utilization of appropriate techniques and methods.

(b) The board shall not deny any applicant who has submitted a complete application for examination, admission to the licensure examinations required by this
 section if the applicant meets the educational and experience requirements of this chapter, and has not committed any acts or engaged in any conduct that would constitute grounds to deny licensure.

(c) The board shall not deny any applicant, whose application for licensure is complete, admission to the clinical examination, nor shall the board postpone or delay any applicant’s clinical examination, solely upon the receipt by the board of a complaint alleging acts or conduct that would constitute grounds to deny licensure.

(d) If an applicant for examination who has passed the California law and ethics examination is the subject of a complaint or is under board investigation for acts or conduct that, if proven to be true, would constitute grounds for the board to deny licensure,
 the board shall permit the applicant to take the clinical examination for licensure, but may notify the applicant that licensure will not be granted pending completion of the investigation.

(e) Notwithstanding Section 135, the board may deny any applicant who has previously failed either the California law and ethics examination or the clinical examination permission to retake either examination pending completion of the investigation of any complaints against the applicant. Nothing in this section shall prohibit the board from denying an applicant admission to any examination or refusing to issue a license to any applicant when an accusation or statement of issues has been filed against the applicant pursuant to Sections 11503 and 11504 of the Government Code, respectively, or the applicant has been denied in accordance with
 subdivision (b) of Section 485.

(f) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the board may destroy all examination materials two years following the date of an examination.

(g) An applicant for licensure shall not be eligible to participate in the clinical examination if the applicant fails to obtain a passing score on the clinical examination within seven years from their initial attempt, unless the applicant takes and obtains a passing score on the current version of the California law and ethics examination.

(h) A passing score on the clinical examination shall be accepted by the board for a period of seven years from the date the examination was taken.

(i) An
 applicant for licensure who has qualified pursuant to this chapter shall be issued a license as a marriage and family therapist in the form that the board deems appropriate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 787, Sec. 61.   (SB 775)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4980.54.

(a) The Legislature recognizes that the education and experience requirements in this chapter constitute only minimal requirements to ensure that an applicant is prepared and qualified to take the licensure examinations as specified in Section 4980.397 and, if an applicant passes those examinations, to begin practice.

(b) In order to continuously improve the competence of licensed and registered marriage and family therapists and as a model for all psychotherapeutic professions, the Legislature encourages all licensees and registrants to regularly engage in continuing education related to the profession or scope of practice as defined in this chapter.

(c) (1) Except as provided in subdivision (f), the board shall not renew any license pursuant to this chapter unless the applicant certifies to the board, on a form prescribed by the board, that the applicant has completed not less than 36 hours of approved continuing education in or relevant to the field of marriage and family therapy in the preceding two years, as determined by the board.

(2) The board shall not renew any registration pursuant to this chapter unless the registrant certifies under penalty of perjury to the board, and on a form prescribed by the board, that they have completed not less than three hours of continuing education on the subject of California law and ethics during the preceding year.

(d) The board shall have the right to audit the records of any applicant to verify the completion of the continuing education requirement. Applicants shall maintain records of completion of required continuing education coursework for a minimum of two years and shall make these records available to the board for auditing purposes upon request.

(e) (1) In determining its continuing education requirements, the board shall consider including a course in menopausal mental health.

(2) In determining its continuing education requirements, the board shall consider including a course in maternal mental health.

(f) The board may establish exceptions from the continuing education requirements of this
 section for good cause, as defined by the board.

(g) The continuing education shall be obtained from one of the following sources:

(1) A school, college, or university that is accredited or approved, as defined in Section 4980.03. Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed as requiring coursework to be offered as part of a regular degree program.

(2) Other continuing education providers, as specified by the board by regulation.

(h) The board shall establish, by regulation, a procedure for identifying acceptable providers of continuing education courses, and all providers of continuing education, as described in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision
 (g), shall adhere to procedures established by the board. The board may revoke or deny the right of a provider to offer continuing education coursework pursuant to this section for failure to comply with this section or any regulation adopted pursuant to this section.

(i) Training, education, and coursework by approved providers shall incorporate one or more of the following:

(1) Aspects of the discipline that are fundamental to the understanding or the practice of marriage and family therapy.

(2) Aspects of the discipline of marriage and family therapy in which significant recent developments have occurred.

(3) Aspects of other disciplines that enhance the
 understanding or the practice of marriage and family therapy.

(j) A system of continuing education for licensed marriage and family therapists shall include courses directly related to the diagnosis, assessment, and treatment of the client population being served.

(k) The continuing education requirements of this section shall comply fully with the guidelines for mandatory continuing education established by the Department of Consumer Affairs pursuant to Section 166.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 787, Sec. 62.   (SB 775)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4980.55.

As a model for all therapeutic professions, and to acknowledge respect and regard for the consuming public, all licensed marriage and family therapists are encouraged to provide to each client, at an appropriate time and within the context of the psychotherapeutic relationship, an accurate and informative statement of the therapist’s experience, education, specialities, professional orientation, and any other information deemed appropriate by the licensee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 316, Sec. 21.   (SB 1466)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

4980.57.

(a) The board shall require a licensee who began graduate study prior to January 1, 2004, to take a continuing education course during his or her first renewal period after the operative date of this section in spousal or partner abuse assessment, detection, and intervention strategies, including community resources, cultural factors, and same gender abuse dynamics. On and after January 1, 2005, the course shall consist of not less than seven hours of training. Equivalent courses in spousal or partner abuse assessment, detection, and intervention strategies taken prior to the operative date of this section or proof of equivalent teaching or practice experience may be submitted to the board and at its discretion, may be accepted in satisfaction of this requirement.

(b) Continuing education courses taken pursuant to this section shall be applied to the 36 hours of approved continuing education required under subdivision (c) of Section 4980.54.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 588, Sec. 61.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

4980.60.

(a) The board may adopt those rules and regulations as may be necessary to enable it to carry into effect the provisions of this chapter. The adoption, amendment, or repeal of those rules and regulations shall be made in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(b) The board may, by rules or regulations, adopt, amend, or repeal rules of advertising and professional conduct appropriate to the establishment and maintenance of a high standard of integrity in the profession, provided that the rules or regulations are not inconsistent with Section 4982. Every person who holds a license to practice marriage and family therapy shall be governed by the rules of professional conduct.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1013, Sec. 31.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

4980.70.

Except as provided by Section 159.5, the board may employ whatever additional personnel is necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1365, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

4980.72.

The board may issue a license to a person who, at the time of submitting an application for a license pursuant to this chapter, holds a license in another jurisdiction of the United States as a marriage and family therapist at the highest level for independent clinical practice if all of the following requirements are met:

(a) The applicant’s license in the other jurisdiction has been current, active, and unrestricted in that jurisdiction for at least two years immediately before the date the application was received by the board. The applicant shall disclose to the board for review any past restrictions or disciplinary action on an out-of-state license, and the board shall consider these actions in
 determining whether to issue a license to the applicant.

(b) The applicant’s degree that qualified the person for the out-of-state license is a master’s or doctoral degree that was obtained from an accredited or approved institution.

(c) The applicant complies with the fingerprint requirements established by Section 144.

(d) The applicant completes the coursework specified in paragraphs (1) and (2) from an accredited institution or an approved institution or from an acceptable provider of continuing education as specified in Section 4980.54. Undergraduate coursework shall not satisfy these requirements.

(1) A minimum of 12 hours of coursework in California
 law
 and professional ethics that includes, but is not limited to, instruction in advertising, scope of practice, scope of competence, treatment of minors, confidentiality, dangerous clients, psychotherapist-client privilege, recordkeeping, client access to records, state and federal laws relating to confidentiality of patient health information, dual relationships, child abuse, elder and dependent adult abuse, online therapy, insurance reimbursement, civil liability, disciplinary actions and unprofessional conduct, ethics complaints and ethical standards, termination of therapy, standards of care, relevant family law, therapist disclosures to clients, the application of legal and ethical standards in different types of work settings, and licensing law and the licensing process.

(2) At least one semester unit, or 15 hours, of instruction
 that includes an understanding of various California cultures and the social and psychological implications of socioeconomic position.

(e) The applicant obtains a minimum of seven contact hours of
 training or coursework in child abuse assessment and reporting, as specified in Section 28, and any regulations promulgated pursuant to that section.

(f) On or after January 1, 2021, the applicant shall show proof of completion of at least six hours of coursework or applied experience under supervision in suicide risk assessment and intervention using one of the methods specified in Section 4980.396.

(g) The applicant passes the board-administered California law and ethics examination specified in Section 4980.397. The clinical examination specified in Section 4980.397 shall be waived for an applicant qualifying under this section.

(h) This section was developed based on an examination of the licensure
 requirements for marriage and family therapists on a national level. This section shall not be construed to apply to any provisions under this division or Division 3 (commencing with Section 5000) other than this act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 787, Sec. 63.   (SB 775)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4980.74.

(a) This section applies to persons with education gained from an out-of-state school or experience gained outside of California who apply for licensure or registration and who do not qualify for a license under Section 4980.72.

(b) The board shall accept education gained from an out-of-state school for purposes of satisfying licensure or registration requirements if the education is substantially equivalent, as defined in Section 4980.78, and the applicant complies with Section 4980.76, if applicable. The applicant’s degree title need not be identical to that required by Section 4980.36 or 4980.37.

(c) The board shall
 accept experience gained outside of California for purposes of satisfying licensure or registration requirements if the experience is substantially equivalent to the experience required by this chapter. If the applicant has fewer than 3,000 hours of qualifying supervised experience, the board shall accept as qualifying supervised experience the amount of time the applicant held an active license in good standing in another state or country as a marriage and family therapist at the highest level for independent clinical practice at a rate of 100 hours per month, up to a maximum of 1,200 hours.

(d) An applicant who obtained a license or registration in another state or country may qualify for licensure with the board without taking the clinical examination specified in Section 4980.397 if both of the following conditions are met:

(1) The applicant obtained a passing score on the clinical licensing examination set forth in regulation as accepted by the board.

(2) The applicant’s license or registration in that state or country is active, in good standing at the time of the application, and is not revoked, suspended, surrendered, denied, or otherwise restricted or encumbered.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 787, Sec. 64.   (SB 775)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4980.76.

An applicant for licensure or registration with a degree obtained from an educational institution outside the United States shall provide the board with a comprehensive evaluation of the degree performed by a foreign credential evaluation service that is a member of the National Association of Credential Evaluation Services (NACES), and shall provide any other documentation the board deems necessary.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 26, Sec. 17.   (SB 33)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

4980.78.

(a) This section applies to persons with education gained from an out-of-state school who apply for licensure or registration and who do not qualify for a license under Section 4980.72.

(b) For purposes of Section 4980.74, education is substantially equivalent if all of the following requirements are met:

(1) The degree is obtained from an accredited institution or approved institution and consists of, at a minimum, the following:

(A) (i) For an applicant who obtained a degree within the timeline prescribed by subdivision (a) of Section 4980.36,
 the degree shall contain no less than 60 semester units or 90 quarter units of instruction.

(ii) Up to 12 semester units or 18 quarter units of instruction may be remediated, if missing from the degree. The remediation may occur while the applicant is registered as an associate.

(B) For an applicant who obtained a degree within the timeline prescribed by subdivision (a) of Section 4980.37, the degree shall contain no less than 48 semester units or 72 quarter units of
 instruction.

(C) (i) Six semester units or nine quarter units of supervised practicum, including, but not limited to, a minimum of 150 hours of face-to-face experience counseling individuals, couples, families, or groups, and an additional 75 hours of either face-to-face experience counseling individuals, couples, families, or groups or client centered advocacy, or a combination of face-to-face experience counseling individuals, couples, families, or groups and client centered advocacy.

(ii) An out-of-state applicant who holds a valid license in good standing in another state or country as a marriage and family therapist at the highest level for independent clinical practice is exempt from the practicum requirement specified in clause (i).

(D) Twelve semester units or 18 quarter units in the areas of marriage, family, and child counseling and marital and family systems approaches to treatment, as specified in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 4980.36.

(2) The applicant shall complete coursework in California law and ethics as follows:

(A) An applicant who completed a course in law and professional ethics for marriage and family therapists as specified in paragraph (8) of subdivision (a) of Section 4980.81, that did not contain instruction in California law and ethics, shall complete a 12-hour course in California law and professional ethics. The content of the course shall include, but not be limited to, advertising, scope
 of practice, scope of competence, treatment of minors, confidentiality, dangerous patients, psychotherapist-patient privilege, recordkeeping, patient access to records, state and federal laws relating to confidentiality of patient health information, dual relationships, child abuse, elder and dependent adult abuse, online therapy, insurance reimbursement, civil liability, disciplinary actions and unprofessional conduct, ethics complaints and ethical standards, termination of therapy, standards of care, relevant family law, therapist disclosures to patients, the application of legal and ethical standards in different types of work settings, and licensing law and licensing process. The coursework shall be from an accredited institution, an approved institution, or from a continuing education provider identified as acceptable by the board pursuant to Section 4980.54. This coursework shall be completed before registration
 as an associate.

(B) An applicant who has not completed a course in law and professional ethics for marriage and family therapists as specified in paragraph (8) of subdivision (a) of Section 4980.81 shall complete this required coursework. The coursework shall contain content specific to California law and ethics. This coursework shall be completed before registration as an associate.

(3) The applicant completes the educational requirements specified in Section 4980.81 not already completed in the applicant’s education. The coursework shall be from an accredited